test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-k25_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - : # k_
    vøllur+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: vøllur
    vøllur+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef: vøll
    vøllur+N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef: vølli
    vøllur+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef: vallar
    vøllur+N+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef: vøllir
    vøllur+N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef: vøllir
    vøllur+N+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef: vøllum
    vøllur+N+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef: valla
    vøllur+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+Def: vøllurin
    vøllur+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Def: vøllin
    vøllur+N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Def: vøllinum
    vøllur+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Def: vallarins
    vøllur+N+Msc+Pl+Nom+Def: vøllirnir
    vøllur+N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Def: vøllirnar
    vøllur+N+Msc+Pl+Dat+Def: vøllunum
    vøllur+N+Msc+Pl+Gen+Def: vallanna
